Maryland, session 2026, HB1105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
14 That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
15 Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
16 5–106.
17 (KK) A PROSECUTION OR CIVIL SUIT FOR ENFORCEMENT OF A LOCAL
18 CONSUMER PROTECTION CODE FOR WHICH EQUITABLE RELIEF, A FINE, OR A
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1105*

2 HOUSE BILL 1105
1 PENALTY IS PROVIDED SHALL BE INSTITUTED WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER LOCAL
2 AUTHORITIES KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN OF THE VIOLATION.
3 SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
4 October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.